Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3126
Tax credit; limitations.

(1) The total amount of tax credits allowed in any fiscal year under the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars.

(2) The maximum allowable tax credit claimed under the act in any single taxable year for any qualified production activity that is a full-length film, made-for-television movie, television series of at least five episodes, or streaming television series shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB650, § 48.